Vermont, session 2025-2026, H303.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 6602 is amended to read:
§ 6602. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources or his or her
duly authorized representative.
* * *
(50) “Biosolids” means septage or sewage sludge derived, in whole or in
part, from domestic wastes that have been subjected to a treatment process for
the reduction of pathogens and have been demonstrated to meet the applicable
requirements in Agency rules for vector attraction reduction and pathogen
reduction.
(51) “Septage” means the liquid and solid materials pumped from a
septic tank, portable toilet, or cesspool during cleaning.
(52) “Sludge” means any solid, semisolid, or liquid generated from a
municipal, commercial, or industrial wastewater treatment facility or process,
water supply treatment plant, air pollution control facility, or any other such
waste having similar characteristics and effects. “Sludge” includes Class A
and Class B sewage sludge as those terms are defined under 40 C.F.R. Part
503.
VT LEG #380577 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.303
2025 Page 3 of 7
(53) “Wastewater treatment facility” has the same meaning as in section
1295 of this title.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 6604b is amended to read:
§ 6604b. TESTING OF SOLID WASTES PRIOR TO BENEFICIAL USE
ON LAND OR DISTRIBUTION AND MARKETING
PROHIBITION ON LAND APPLICATION OF SLUDGE,
SEPTAGE, AND BIOSOLIDS AND SALE OF COMPOST AND
OTHER AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS AND MATERIALS
CONTAINING SLUDGE, SEPTAGE, AND BIOSOLIDS
(a) The Secretary of Natural Resources, in consultation with the Secretary
of Agriculture, Food and Markets and with the Commissioner of Health, shall
adopt rules to establish a testing program for all sewage sludge, or similar
liquid wastes, prior to their beneficial use on land or prior to distribution and
marketing of those wastes in liquid or solid form. The testing program shall
establish a process for the determination of minimum testing frequencies and
specific parameters for which analysis must be completed and shall detail
procedures by which samples are collected, stored, and tested.
(b) In establishing the process for the determination of test parameters and
frequency, the rules shall take into account the size and complexity of the
facility, the nature of the service area or collection system, including industrial
VT LEG #380577 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.303
2025 Page 4 of 7
contributions, the frequency of sewage sludge use on the land, and any existing
data that is pertinent to the facility.
(c) Rules regarding the application of waste to fields shall take into
consideration the characteristics of the specific waste involved and shall
calculate the heavy metal or micronutrient soil holding capacity based on a pH
of 5.5 for the soil type at the application site, as appropriate.
(d) A person subject to this section shall make all analytical results derived
from the testing program provided for in this section available to the public
upon request.
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person shall not
apply to or spread on any land in the State:
(1) septage, sludge, or biosolids;
(2) compost material that includes in its production the use of septage,
sludge, or biosolids; or
(3) any other product or material that is intended for use as a fertilizer,
soil amendment, topsoil replacement, or mulch or for other similar agricultural
purpose that is derived from or contains septage, sludge, or biosolids.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person shall not
sell or distribute in the State:
(1) compost material that includes in its production the use of septage,
sludge, or biosolids; or
VT LEG #380577 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.303
2025 Page 5 of 7
(2) any other product or material that is intended for use as a fertilizer,
soil amendment, topsoil replacement, or mulch or for other similar agricultural
purpose that is derived from or contains septage, sludge, or biosolids.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 6605 is amended to read:
§ 6605. SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT FACILITY CERTIFICATION
(a)(1) No person shall construct, substantially alter, or operate any solid
waste management facility without first obtaining certification from the
Secretary for such the facility, site, or activity, except for sludge or septage
treatment or storage facilities located within the fenced area of a domestic
wastewater treatment plant facility permitted under chapter 47 of this title.
This exemption for sludge or septage treatment or storage facilities shall exist
only if both of the following are met:
(A) the treatment facility does not use a process to reduce pathogens
further in order to qualify for marketing and distribution; and
(B) the The facility is not a drying bed, lagoon, or nonconcrete
bunker; and.
(C)(B) the The owner of the facility has submitted a sludge and
septage management plan to the Secretary and the Secretary has approved the
plan as conforming with the requirements and established standard for proper
management of these materials. Noncompliance with an approved sludge and
VT LEG #380577 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.303
2025 Page 6 of 7
septage management plan shall constitute a violation of the terms of this
chapter, as well as a violation under chapters 201 and 211 of this title.
(2) Certification shall be valid for a period not to exceed 10 years.
* * *
(g)(1) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this section, the Secretary
may authorize the land disposal or management of sludge or septage by an
applicant at any certified site or facility with available capacity, provided the
Secretary finds:
(A) that the applicant needs to dispose of accumulated sludge or
septage promptly, and that delay would likely cause public health, or
environmental damage, or nuisance conditions, or would result in excessive
and unnecessary cost to the public, and that the applicant has lost authority to
use previously certified sites through no act or omission of the applicant; and
(B) that at the certified site or facility to be used:
(i) the certificate holder agrees in writing to allow use of the site
or facility by the applicant;
(ii) management of the applicant’s sludge or septage is compatible
with the site or facility certificate;
(iii) all terms and conditions of the original certification will
continue to be met with addition of the applicant’s sludge or septage; and
VT LEG #380577 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.303
2025 Page 7 of 7
(iv) beginning January 1, 2013, any sludge or septage applied to
land shall be applied according to a nutrient management plan approved by the
Secretary.
(2) Issuance of an approval under this subsection shall comply with
section 7716 of this title. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380577 v.1